Nevada, session 83, AB217.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A school district or public school, and any employee of a
school district or public school, shall not grant a United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement officer, or other federal
official engaging in the investigation or enforcement of
immigration laws, permission to access the grounds, buildings or
facilities of a school district or public school without a lawful
order or warrant issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
2. A school district or public school, and any employee of a
school district or public school, shall not disclose or provide in
writing, verbally or in any other manner, the education records of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
or any information about a pupil, or the family or household of a
pupil, to a United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement
officer or other federal official, or a state or local law enforcement
officer, engaging in the investigation or enforcement of
immigration laws, except pursuant to a lawful order or warrant
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
3. Any person who knowingly and willfully violates the
provisions of this section is subject to disciplinary action by the
school district or public school which employs the person.
4. As used in this section, “public school” includes, without
limitation, a charter school or university school for profoundly
gifted pupils.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)